Utah statutes.
34A-3-107.   Benefits -- Disability compensation, death, medical, hospital, and burial expenses -- Procedure and payments.

(1)  The benefits to which an employee with a disability or the employee's dependents are entitled under this chapter shall be based upon the employee's average weekly wage at the time the cause of action arises and shall be computed in accordance with and in all ways shall be equivalent to the benefits for disability and death provided in Chapter 2, Workers' Compensation Act.

(2)  The employee with a disability is entitled to medical, hospital, and burial expenses equivalent to those provided in Chapter 2.

(3)  The procedure and payment of benefits under this chapter shall be equivalent to and consistent with Chapter 2, including Section 34A-2-703.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

